Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 36 The Inter-Agency Food & Nutrition Policy Advisory Council

21-36-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “The Inter-Agency Food and Nutrition Policy Advisory Council Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 3.

21-36-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise specified, the following word has the following meaning: “Council” means the inter-agency food and nutrition policy advisory council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 3.

21-36-3.
Council composition.

There shall be an inter-agency food and nutrition policy advisory council which shall consist of seven (7) members: the director of health, or his or her designee; the director of environmental management, or his or her designee; the director of administration, or his or her designee; the director of the department of human services, or his or her designee; the director of the office of healthy aging, or his or her designee; the director of the department of corrections, or his or her designee; and the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or his or her designee. The members of the commission shall elect a chairperson from among themselves.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 73, § 1.

21-36-4.
Powers and duties.

The council shall examine issues regarding the identification and development of solutions to regulatory and policy barriers to developing a strong sustainable food economy and healthful nutrition practices.

The council shall collaborate with other task forces, committees, or organizations that are pursuing initiatives or studies similar to the purposes and duties outlined in this chapter.

The council shall collaborate with, serve as a resource to, and receive input from food policy councils in the state.

The council shall examine any other program and policy issues the council considers pertinent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 3.

21-36-5.
Reporting requirements.

The council shall provide a written report to the general assembly by March 30 of each year regarding its activities for the preceding calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 3.

21-36-6.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph or part of this chapter shall for any reason be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of it, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph or part directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 3.